District of Columbia statutes.
28-3804

Assignment of earnings and authorization to confess judgment prohibited.

(a)

A creditor may not take an assignment of earnings of the consumer for payment or as security for payment of an obligation arising out of a consumer credit sale or direct installment loan.

(b)

A creditor may not take or accept from the consumer a warrant or power of attorney or other authorization for the creditor, or other person acting on his behalf, to confess judgment arising out of a consumer credit sale or direct installment loan.

(c)

An assignment of earnings or an authorization in violation of this section is subject to the provisions of section 28-3813(d)(1) of this subtitle.

History

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 670, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3804.
1973 Ed., § 28-3804.